fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Sisäpelit > Pöytäfutis: Pöytäfutispallot; Pöytäfutispöytien osat ja tarvikkeet; Pöytäfutispöydät
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Igre u zatvorenom > Stolni nogomet: Lopte za stolni nogomet; Dijelovi i dodaci za stolove za stolni nogomet; Stolovi za stolni nogomet
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室內運動 > 手足球: 手足球用球; 手足球零件/配件; 手足球桌
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Игри на закрито > Футбол на маса: Топки за футбол на маса; Части и аксесоари за футболни маси; Футболни маси
it: Articoli sportivi > Giochi indoor > Biliardino: Palline per calcetto; Accessori e componenti per tavolo da biliardino; Tavoli da biliardino
ja: スポーツ用品 > 室内競技・室内ゲーム > フーズボール: テーブルサッカー用ボール; テーブルサッカー台パーツ; テーブルサッカー台
en: Sporting Goods > Indoor Games > Foosball: Foosball Balls; Foosball Table Parts & Accessories; Foosball Tables
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Gry towarzyskie > Piłkarzyki: Piłki do gry w piłkarzyki; Części stołów do gry w piłkarzyki; Stoły do gry w piłkarzyki
de: Sportartikel > Indoor - Aktivitäten > Tischfußball: Tischfußball-Bälle; Zubehör für Tischfußballtische; Tischfußball-Tische
hu: Sportszerek > Beltéri játékok > Csocsó: Csocsólabdák; Csocsóasztal-alkatrészek és -kiegészítők; Csocsóasztalok
ru: Спортивные товары > Игры в помещении > Настольный футбол: Мячики для настольного футбола; Детали и аксессуары для столов для настольного футбола; Столы для настольного футбола
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Igre v zaprtih prostorih > Namizni nogomet: Žoge za namizni nogomet; Deli in dodatki za mize za namizni nogomet; Mize za namizni nogomet
nb: Sportsutstyr > Innendørsspill > Foosball: Foosballballer; Deler og tilbehør til foosballbord; Foosballbord
da: Sportsartikler > Indendørsspil > Bordfodbold: Bordfodboldbolde; Bordfodboldborde – dele; Bordfodboldborde
nl: Sportartikelen > Binnenspelletjes > Tafelvoetbal: Ballen voor tafelvoetbal; Onderdelen voor voetbaltafels; Voetbaltafels
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Παιχνίδια εσωτερικού χώρου > Ποδοσφαιράκι: Μπάλες για ποδοσφαιράκι; Εξαρτήματα και αξεσουάρ τραπεζιού για ποδοσφαιράκι; Τραπέζια για ποδοσφαιράκι
ko: 스포츠용품 > 실내용 게임 > 푸스볼: 푸스볼 공; 푸스볼 테이블 부품/부대용품; 푸스볼 테이블
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Các môn thi đấu trong nhà > Bi lắc: Bóng foosball; Phụ kiện bàn bi lắc; Bàn lắc bóng đá
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Interiérové hry > Stolný futbal: Lopty na stolný futbal; Časti a príslušenstvo stola na stolný futbal; Stoly na stolný futbal
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Jogos internos > Pebolim: Bolas de pebolim; Peças de mesa de pebolim; Mesas de pebolim
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 室内游戏 > 桌上足球: 桌上足球用球; 桌上足球零件/配件; 桌上足球台
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > เกมในร่ม > ฟุสบอล: ลูกฟุตบอลโต๊ะ; ชิ้นส่วนและอุปกรณ์โต๊ะฟุตบอล; โต๊ะฟุตบอล
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Jogos em interior > Matraquilhos: Bolas de matraquilhos; Acessórios e peças para mesa de matraquilhos; Mesas de matraquilhos
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Jocuri de interior > Fusbal: Mingi de fusbal; Piese și accesorii pentru mese de fusbal; Mese de fusbal
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Indoorové aktivity > Stolní fotbal: Míčky na stolní fotbal; Díly stolů na stolní fotbal; Stoly na stolní fotbal
sv: Sportartiklar > Inomhussporter > Bordsfotboll: Bollar till bordsfotboll; Delar till bordsfotbollsbord; Bordsfotbollsbord
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Juegos de interior > Futbolín: Bolas de futbolín; Piezas y accesorios para mesas de futbolín; Mesas de futbolín
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Kambario žaidimai > Stalo futbolas: Stalo futbolo kamuoliukai; Stalo futbolas stalų dalys ir priedai; Stalo futbolas stalai
fr: Équipements sportifs > Jeux d’intérieur > Baby-foot: Balles de baby-foot; Pièces et accessoires pour tables de baby-foot; Tables de baby-foot
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > İç Mekan Sporları > Langırt: Langırt Topları; Langırt Masası Parçaları ve Aksesuarları; Langırt Masaları